Washington statutes.
RCW 3.74.940

Validation—1991 c 363; 1965 ex.s. c 110.

Any prior action by the legislative authority of any county with a population of less than two hundred ten thousand to make the provisions of chapters 3.30 through 3.74 RCW applicable to their county and the organization of any justice court as a result thereof, and all other things and proceedings done or taken by such county or by their respective officers acting under or in pursuance to such prior action and organization are hereby declared legal and valid and of full force and effect.

[ 1991 c 363 s 6; 1965 ex.s. c 110 s 4.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.